Utah statutes.
32A-11a-101 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Title -- Legislative intent.
(1)  This chapter shall be known as the "Utah Beer Industry Distribution Act."
(2) (a)  It is the policy of the Legislature to regulate and control the
importation, sale, and distribution of beer within the state in the exercise
of its powers under the Twenty-first Amendment to the Constitution of the
United States and pursuant to the Utah Constitution.
(b)  In furtherance of the policy described in Subsection (2)(a), this chapter
is enacted to:
(i)  promote good faith and fair dealing in the business relationships between
suppliers, wholesalers, and retailers of beer; and
(ii)  provide for the establishment and maintenance of an orderly system for
the distribution of beer in accordance with the laws of the state regulating
the sale and distribution of beer to the public.
